Florida, session 2026, HB559.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
44
45 Section 1. Subsections (4) through (7) of section 828.12,
46 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (6) through (9),
47 respectively, present subsection (7) is amended, new subsections
48 (4) and (5) are added to that section, and subsections (1) and
49 (2) of that section are republished, to read:
50 828.12 Cruelty to animals.—
Page 2 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
51 (1) A person who unnecessarily overloads, overdrives,
52 torments, deprives of necessary sustenance or shelter, or
53 unnecessarily mutilates, or kills any animal, or causes the same
54 to be done, or carries in or upon any vehicle, or otherwise, any
55 animal in a cruel or inhumane manner, commits animal cruelty, a
56 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
57 775.082 or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or both.
58 (2) A person who intentionally commits an act to any
59 animal, or a person who owns or has the custody or control of
60 any animal and fails to act, which results in the cruel death,
61 or excessive or repeated infliction of unnecessary pain or
62 suffering, or causes the same to be done, commits aggravated
63 animal cruelty, a felony of the third degree, punishable as
64 provided in s. 775.082 or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or
65 both.
66 (a) A person convicted of a violation of this subsection,
67 where the finder of fact determines that the violation includes
68 the knowing and intentional torture or torment of an animal that
69 injures, mutilates, or kills the animal, shall be ordered to pay
70 a minimum mandatory fine of $2,500 and undergo psychological
71 counseling or complete an anger management treatment program.
72 (b) A person convicted of a second or subsequent violation
73 of this subsection shall be required to pay a minimum mandatory
74 fine of $5,000 and serve a minimum mandatory period of
75 incarceration of 6 months. In addition, the person shall be
Page 3 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
76 released only upon expiration of sentence, is not eligible for
77 parole, control release, or any form of early release, and must
78 serve 100 percent of the court-imposed sentence. Any plea of
79 nolo contendere shall be considered a conviction for purposes of
80 this subsection.
81 (4) A person 18 years of age or older commits a felony of
82 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
83 775.083, or s. 775.084, if he or she causes or entices a minor
84 to commit, or in the presence of a minor commits, a violation of
85 subsection (2).
86 (5)(a) If a minor commits an act of animal cruelty as
87 described in subsection (1) or subsection (2), the juvenile
88 court must order the minor to undergo a psychological evaluation
89 and, if recommended, receive counseling or treatment for a
90 length of time as prescribed by the juvenile court.
91 (b) The minor's parent or guardian, or the state if the
92 minor is a ward of the state, shall pay the cost of the
93 psychological evaluation, counseling, or treatment as ordered by
94 the juvenile court in paragraph (a). If the juvenile court makes
95 a finding of indigency and significant financial hardship, the
96 court shall waive the fee or reduce it to an amount deemed
97 appropriate. If the minor's parent or guardian willfully refuses
98 to follow the recommended treatment for the minor, the juvenile
99 court may hold the parent or guardian in contempt.
100 (9)(a)(7) Before Beginning January 1, 2027 2026, the
Page 4 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
101 Department of Law Enforcement shall post on its website, in a
102 searchable format prescribed by the department, the name and all
103 aliases, date of birth, race, county of conviction, charge or
104 charges, case number, disposition, description of any
105 identifying marks and tattoos, and a photograph taken at the
106 time of booking related to the animal cruelty offense of each
107 individual names of those individuals who has have been
108 convicted of, or who has have entered a plea of guilty or nolo
109 contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of this
110 section.
111 (b) The department shall post the information about each
112 individual as required in paragraph (a) for the following
113 periods:
114 1. Three years from the date of conviction, for a first
115 conviction of a misdemeanor offense.
116 2. Five years from the date of conviction, for a first
117 conviction of a felony offense.
118 3. Ten years from the date of conviction, for a subsequent
119 conviction of either a misdemeanor or felony offense.
120 (c) The department shall develop a procedure to allow a
121 person whose conviction has been overturned or who has received
122 a sealing of the criminal history record for which his or her
123 information was publicly posted as required in paragraph (a) to
124 petition for the removal of his or her information. The
125 department, after receiving a petition with adequate
Page 5 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
126 documentation, must remove such information from the website
127 within 30 days. The department may adopt rules to implement this
128 paragraph.
129 (d) Each clerk of court and county detention facility must
130 provide the Department of Law Enforcement with the information,
131 data, and images required in paragraph (a).
132 Section 2. Subsections (4) through (10) of section
133 828.122, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5)
134 through (11), respectively, subsection (3) of that section is
135 amended, and a new subsection (4) is added to that section, to
136 read:
137 828.122 Fighting or baiting animals; offenses; penalties.—
138 (3) Any person who knowingly commits any of the following
139 acts commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as
140 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084:
141 (a) Baiting, breeding, training, transporting, selling,
142 owning, possessing, or using any wild or domestic animal for the
143 purpose of animal fighting or baiting;
144 (b) Owning, possessing, or selling equipment for use in
145 any activity described in paragraph (a);
146 (c) Owning, leasing, managing, operating, or having
147 control of any property kept or used for any activity described
148 in paragraph (a) or paragraph (b);
149 (d) Promoting, staging, advertising, or charging any
150 admission fee to a fight or baiting between two or more animals;
Page 6 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
151 (e) Performing any service or act to facilitate animal
152 fighting or baiting, including, but not limited to, providing
153 security, refereeing, or handling or transporting animals or
154 being a stakeholder of any money wagered on animal fighting or
155 baiting;
156 (f) Removing or facilitating the removal of any animal
157 impounded under this section from an agency where the animal is
158 impounded or from a location designated by the court under
159 subsection (5) (4), subsection (6) (5), or subsection (8) (7),
160 without the prior authorization of the court;
161 (g) Betting or wagering any money or other valuable
162 consideration on the fighting or baiting of animals; or
163 (h) Attending the fighting or baiting of animals.
164
165 Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the
166 contrary, possession of the animal alone does not constitute a
167 violation of this section.
168 (4) A person 18 years of age or older commits a felony of
169 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
170 775.083, or s. 775.084, if he or she causes or entices a minor
171 to commit, or in the presence of a minor commits, a violation of
172 subsection (3).
173 Section 3. Subsections (4) and (5) of section 828.126,
174 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) and (6),
175 respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to that section, and
Page 7 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
176 subsection (2) of that section is republished, to read:
177 828.126 Sexual activities involving animals.—
178 (2) A person may not:
179 (a) Knowingly engage in any sexual contact with an animal;
180 (b) Knowingly cause, aid, or abet another person to engage
181 in any sexual contact with an animal;
182 (c) Knowingly permit any sexual contact with an animal to
183 be conducted on any premises under his or her charge or control;
184 (d) Knowingly organize, promote, conduct, aid, abet,
185 participate in as an observer, or advertise, offer, solicit, or
186 accept an offer of an animal for the purpose of sexual contact
187 with such animal, or perform any service in the furtherance of
188 an act involving any sexual contact with an animal; or
189 (e) Knowingly film, distribute, or possess any
190 pornographic image or video of a person and an animal engaged in
191 any of the activities prohibited by this section.
192 (4) A person 18 years of age or older commits a felony of
193 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
194 775.083, or s. 775.084, if he or she causes or entices a minor
195 to commit, or in the presence of a minor commits, a violation of
196 subsection (2).
197 Section 4. Subsection (2) of section 828.27, Florida
198 Statutes, is amended to read:
199 828.27 Local animal control or cruelty ordinances;
200 penalty.—
Page 8 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
201 (2) The governing body of a county or municipality is
202 authorized to enact ordinances relating to animal control or
203 cruelty, which ordinances must provide:
204 (a) That a violation of such an ordinance is a civil
205 infraction.
206 (b) A maximum civil penalty not to exceed:
207 1. Two thousand five hundred dollars for a first
208 violation.
209 2. Five thousand dollars for a second violation.
210 3. Seven thousand five hundred dollars for a third or
211 subsequent violation $500.
212 (c) A civil penalty of less than the maximum civil penalty
213 if the person who has committed the civil infraction does not
214 contest the citation.
215 (d) For the issuance of a citation by an officer who has
216 probable cause to believe that a person has committed an act in
217 violation of an ordinance.
218 (e) For the contesting of a citation in the county court.
219 (f) That, if a person fails to pay the civil penalty,
220 fails to appear in court to contest the citation, or fails to
221 appear in court as required by subsection (6), the court may
222 issue an order to show cause upon the request of the governing
223 body of the county or municipality. This order shall require
224 such persons to appear before the court to explain why action on
225 the citation has not been taken. If any person who is issued
Page 9 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
226 such order fails to appear in response to the court's directive,
227 that person may be held in contempt of court.
228 (g) Such procedures and provisions as are necessary to
229 implement any ordinances enacted under the authority of this
230 section.
231 Section 5. Paragraphs (a), (e), (f), and (g) of subsection
232 (3) of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
233 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
234 ranking chart.—
235 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
236 (a) LEVEL 1
237
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
238
24.118(3)(a) 3rd Counterfeit or altered state
lottery ticket.
239
104.0616(2) 3rd Unlawfully distributing,
ordering, requesting,
collecting, delivering, or
possessing vote-by-mail
ballots.
240
212.054(2)(b) 3rd Discretionary sales surtax;
Page 10 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
limitations, administration,
and collection.
241
212.15(2)(b) 3rd Failure to remit sales taxes,
amount $1,000 or more but less
than $20,000.
242
316.1935(1) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude
law enforcement officer.
243
319.30(5) 3rd Sell, exchange, give away
certificate of title or
identification number plate.
244
319.35(1)(a) 3rd Tamper, adjust, change, etc.,
an odometer.
245
320.26(1)(a) 3rd Counterfeit, manufacture, or
sell registration license
plates or validation stickers.
246
322.212 3rd Possession of forged, stolen,
(1)(a)-(c) counterfeit, or unlawfully
issued driver license;
possession of simulated
Page 11 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
identification.
247
322.212(4) 3rd Supply or aid in supplying
unauthorized driver license or
identification card.
248
322.212(5)(a) 3rd False application for driver
license or identification card.
249
414.39(3)(a) 3rd Fraudulent misappropriation of
public assistance funds by
employee/official, value more
than $200.
250
443.071(1) 3rd False statement or
representation to obtain or
increase reemployment
assistance benefits.
251
509.151(1) 3rd Defraud an innkeeper, food or
lodging value $1,000 or more.
252
517.302(1) 3rd Violation of the Florida
Securities and Investor
Protection Act.
Page 12 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
253
713.69 3rd Tenant removes property upon
which lien has accrued, value
$1,000 or more.
254
812.014(3)(c) 3rd Petit theft (3rd conviction);
theft of any property not
specified in subsection (2).
255
815.04(4)(a) 3rd Offense against intellectual
property (i.e., computer
programs, data).
256
817.52(2) 3rd Hiring with intent to defraud,
motor vehicle services.
257
817.569(2) 3rd Use of public record or public
records information or
providing false information to
facilitate commission of a
felony.
258
826.01 3rd Bigamy.
259
828.122(3) 3rd Fighting or baiting animals.
Page 13 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
260
831.04(1) 3rd Any erasure, alteration, etc.,
of any replacement deed, map,
plat, or other document listed
in s. 92.28.
261
831.31(1)(a) 3rd Sell, deliver, or possess
counterfeit controlled
substances, all but s.
893.03(5) drugs.
262
832.041(1) 3rd Stopping payment with intent to
defraud $150 or more.
263
832.05(2)(b) & 3rd Knowing, making, issuing
(4)(c) worthless checks $150 or more
or obtaining property in return
for worthless check $150 or
more.
264
838.15(2) 3rd Commercial bribe receiving.
265
838.16 3rd Commercial bribery.
266
843.18 3rd Fleeing by boat to elude a law
Page 14 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
enforcement officer.
267
847.011(1)(a) 3rd Sell, distribute, etc.,
obscene, lewd, etc., material
(2nd conviction).
268
849.09(1)(a)-(d) 3rd Lottery; set up, promote, etc.,
or assist therein, conduct or
advertise drawing for prizes,
or dispose of property or money
by means of lottery.
269
849.23 3rd Gambling-related machines;
"common offender" as to
property rights.
270
849.25(2) 3rd Engaging in bookmaking.
271
860.08 3rd Interfere with a railroad
signal.
272
860.13(1)(a) 3rd Operate aircraft while under
the influence.
273
893.13(2)(a)2. 3rd Purchase of cannabis.
Page 15 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
274
893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of cannabis (more
than 20 grams).
275
934.03(1)(a) 3rd Intercepts, or procures any
other person to intercept, any
wire or oral communication.
276
277 (e) LEVEL 5
278
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
279
316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal
injuries other than serious
bodily injury, failure to stop;
leaving scene.
280
316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
281
Page 16 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel;
obtaining fuel fraudulently.
282
322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor
vehicle with suspended license,
resulting in death or serious
bodily injury.
283
327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving
personal injuries other than
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
284
365.172 2nd Misuse of emergency
(14)(b)2. communications system resulting
in death.
285
379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to:
willful molestation of stone
crab traps, lines, or buoys;
illegal bartering, trading, or
sale, conspiring or aiding in
such barter, trade, or sale, or
supplying, agreeing to supply,
aiding in supplying, or giving
Page 17 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
away stone crab trap tags or
certificates; making, altering,
forging, counterfeiting, or
reproducing stone crab trap
tags; possession of forged,
counterfeit, or imitation stone
crab trap tags; and engaging in
the commercial harvest of stone
crabs while license is
suspended or revoked.
286
379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a
commercial harvester's spiny
lobster trap, line, or buoy.
287
379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more
undersized spiny lobsters.
288
381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs
knowing HIV positive.
289
440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workers'
compensation coverage.
290
440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the
Page 18 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
purpose of making workers'
compensation claims.
291
440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false,
misleading, or incomplete
information with the purpose of
avoiding or reducing workers'
compensation premiums.
292
624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a
certificate or authority;
premium collected $20,000 or
more but less than $100,000.
293
626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized
insurer; repeat offender.
294
790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a
concealed firearm.
295
790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge
destructive device.
296
790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
Page 19 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
destruction, or use of firearms
in violent manner.
297
790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled
shotgun or machine gun.
298
790.23 2nd Felons in possession of
firearms, ammunition, or
electronic weapons or devices.
299
796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 1st offense.
300
800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender less than 18 years of
age.
301
800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
302
806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or
dispense fire bomb with intent
to damage any structure or
property.
Page 20 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
303
810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism
dissemination.
304
810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
305
810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims.
306
812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft
from 20 or more dwellings or
their unenclosed curtilage, or
any combination.
307
812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $10,000 or more
but less than $50,000.
308
812.015 3rd Retail theft; property stolen
(8)(a) & (c)- is valued at $750 or more and
(e) one or more specified acts.
309
812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
Page 21 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
310
812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons.
311
812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or
trafficking in.
312
812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets.
313
812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching.
314
812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or
conducting a chop shop.
315
817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value
$20,000 to $50,000.
316
817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value
$20,000 or more but less than
$100,000.
317
817.2341(1), 3rd Filing false financial
(2)(a) & statements, making false
(3)(a) entries of material fact or
Page 22 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
false statements regarding
property values relating to the
solvency of an insuring entity.
318
817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal
identification information;
value of benefit, services
received, payment avoided, or
amount of injury or fraud,
$5,000 or more or use of
personal identification
information of 10 or more
persons.
319
817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
320
817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent
use of scanning device,
skimming device, or reencoder.
321
825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
in the presence of an elderly
person or disabled adult.
Page 23 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
322
828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent
to inflict intense pain,
serious physical injury, or
death.
323
828.122(3) 3rd Fighting or baiting animals.
324
836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes
for financial gain a sexually
explicit image of an
identifiable person without
consent.
325
839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an
individual in the care and
custody of a state agency
involving great bodily harm or
death.
326
843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to
person; resist arrest with
violence.
327
847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition
Page 24 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
using computer; offender 18
years or older.
328
847.0137 3rd Transmission of pornography by
(2) & (3) electronic device or equipment.
329
847.0138 3rd Transmission of material
(2) & (3) harmful to minors to a minor by
electronic device or equipment.
330
874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
another to join a criminal
gang; second or subsequent
offense.
331
874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 years of age to
join a criminal gang.
332
893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs).
333
Page 25 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
334
893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
university.
335
893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
Page 26 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within
1,000 feet of property used for
religious services or a
specified business site.
336
893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.
drugs) within 1,000 feet of
public housing facility.
337
893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
338
893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
339
340 (f) LEVEL 6
341
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
Page 27 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
342
316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash
involving serious bodily
injury.
343
316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent
conviction.
344
316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding.
345
327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving
serious bodily injury; leaving
scene.
346
400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering
services requiring licensure,
without a license.
347
499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction
history, transaction
information, or transaction
statement.
348
499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of
prescription drug from
Page 28 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
unauthorized person.
349
499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of
prescription drug to
unauthorized person.
350
775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law
enforcement officer.
351
784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly
weapon without intent to kill.
352
784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to
commit felony.
353
784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic
battery by strangulation.
354
784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible
threat.
355
784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person
under 16.
356
784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law
Page 29 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
enforcement officer.
357
784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
358
784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person
65 years of age or older.
359
784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified
official or employee.
360
784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
361
784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code
inspector.
362
787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining
with purpose other than those
in s. 787.01.
363
787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child.
364
Page 30 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon
on school property.
365
790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw
destructive device with intent
to do bodily harm or damage
property.
366
790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb,
explosive, weapon of mass
destruction, act of arson or
violence to state property, or
use of firearms in violent
manner.
367
790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly
missiles into dwellings,
vessels, or vehicles.
368
794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to
participate in sexual activity
by custodial adult.
369
794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with
specified minor.
Page 31 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
370
800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but less than 16 years of age;
offender less than 18 years.
371
800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct;
offender 18 years of age or
older.
372
806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily
harm to firefighter or any
other person.
373
810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
374
810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain
minor victims; 2nd or
subsequent offense.
375
812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or
more, but less than $100,000,
grand theft in 2nd degree.
376
Page 32 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree;
firearm.
377
812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000
or more; coordination of
others.
378
812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen
$750 or more; second or
subsequent conviction.
379
812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated
property stolen within 120 days
is $3,000 or more; coordination
of others.
380
812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts
within specified period.
381
812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with
specified number of other
persons and use of social media
platform.
382
812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other
Page 33 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
weapon (strong-arm robbery).
383
817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia
with intent to create cloned
cellular telephones.
384
817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false
report of a crime resulting in
death.
385
817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more
patients.
386
817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years
of age or older, value $10,000
or more, but less than $50,000.
387
825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
388
825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or
disabled adult.
389
825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation
of an elderly person or
Page 34 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
disabled adult.
390
825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at less than $10,000.
391
827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child.
392
827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child.
393
827.071(5) 3rd Possess, control, or
intentionally view any
photographic material, motion
picture, etc., which includes
child pornography.
394
828.12(4) 3rd Causing or enticing a minor to
commit, or committing in the
presence of a minor, animal
cruelty.
395
828.122(4) 3rd Causing or enticing a minor to
commit, or committing in the
presence of a minor, fighting
or baiting animals.
Page 35 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
396
397
828.126(3) 3rd Sexual activities involving
animals.
398
836.05 2nd Threats; extortion.
399
836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats
to kill, do bodily injury, or
conduct a mass shooting or an
act of terrorism.
400
843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to
escape.
401
847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to
distribute, or possessing with
intent to distribute obscene
materials depicting minors.
402
847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the
production of materials harmful
to minors.
403
847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of
Page 36 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
or with a minor or the visual
depiction of such conduct.
404
893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled
substances resulting in
overdose or serious bodily
injury.
405
914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness,
victim, or informant, with
bodily injury.
406
918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating
physical evidence relating to a
capital felony.
407
944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery
upon or inflicting cruel or
inhuman treatment on an inmate
or offender on community
supervision, resulting in great
bodily harm.
408
944.40 2nd Escapes.
409
Page 37 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding
escaped prisoners.
410
944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband
(firearm, weapon, or explosive)
into correctional facility.
411
951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced
into county detention facility.
412
413 (g) LEVEL 7
414
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
415
316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death,
failure to stop; leaving scene.
416
316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily
injury.
417
316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury
or death to another person;
driving at high speed or with
wanton disregard for safety
Page 38 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
while fleeing or attempting to
elude law enforcement officer
who is in a patrol vehicle with
siren and lights activated.
418
327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious
bodily injury.
419
402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and
negligence or intentional act
resulting in great bodily harm,
permanent disfiguration,
permanent disability, or death.
420
409.920 3rd Medicaid provider fraud;
(2)(b)1.a. $10,000 or less.
421
409.920 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more
(2)(b)1.b. than $10,000, but less than
$50,000.
422
456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care
profession without a license.
423
456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care
Page 39 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
profession without a license
which results in serious bodily
injury.
424
458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a
license.
425
459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine
without a license.
426
460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic
medicine without a license.
427
461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine
without a license.
428
462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without
a license.
429
463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a
license.
430
464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a
license.
431
Page 40 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a
license.
432
466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental
hygiene without a license.
433
467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a
license.
434
468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care
services without a license.
435
483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical
laboratory personnel without a
license.
436
483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics
without a license.
437
484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical
devices without a prescription.
438
484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without
a license.
439
Page 41 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of
chapter 494 in which the total
money and property unlawfully
obtained exceeded $50,000 and
there were five or more
victims.
440
560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or
payment instruments exceeding
$300 but less than $20,000 by a
money services business.
441
560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by
unauthorized person, currency
or payment instruments
exceeding $300 but less than
$20,000.
442
655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000 by financial
institution.
443
775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to
register; failure to renew
Page 42 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
driver license or
identification card; other
registration violations.
444
775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where
children regularly congregate.
445
775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual predator; harbor or
conceal a sexual predator.
446
782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a
person by a person other than
the perpetrator or the
perpetrator of an attempted
felony.
447
782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the
act, procurement, or culpable
negligence of another
(manslaughter).
448
782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or
unborn child by the operation
Page 43 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
of a motor vehicle in a
reckless manner (vehicular
homicide).
449
782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the
operation of a vessel in a
reckless manner (vessel
homicide).
450
784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery;
intentionally causing great
bodily harm or disfigurement.
451
784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using
deadly weapon.
452
784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator
aware victim pregnant.
453
784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of injunction or court order.
454
784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation
of court order.
455
Page 44 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law
enforcement officer.
456
784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually
violent predators facility
staff.
457
784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person
65 years of age or older.
458
784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified
official or employee.
459
784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained
person on visitor or other
detainee.
460
784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code
inspector.
461
787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child;
second or subsequent offense.
462
787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with
a specified prior conviction.
Page 45 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
463
787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
of an adult.
464
787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using
coercion for labor and services
by the transfer or transport of
an adult from outside Florida
to within the state.
465
790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation
subsequent to previous
conviction of s. 790.07(1) or
(2).
466
790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun
under specified circumstances.
467
790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or
deliver hoax bomb.
468
790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use any hoax
bomb while committing or
Page 46 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
attempting to commit a felony.
469
790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or
attempting to use a hoax weapon
of mass destruction.
470
790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or
threatening to use a hoax
weapon of mass destruction
while committing or attempting
to commit a felony.
471
790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a
person who qualifies for the
penalty enhancements provided
for in s. 874.04.
472
794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation;
consent by a parent, guardian,
or a person in custodial
authority to a victim younger
than 18 years of age.
473
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 2nd offense.
Page 47 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
474
796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a
prostitute; 3rd and subsequent
offense.
475
800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim younger than 12 years of
age; offender younger than 18
years of age.
476
800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years of
age; offender 18 years of age
or older.
477
800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation;
victim 12 years of age or older
but younger than 16 years;
offender 18 years or older;
prior conviction for specified
sex offense.
478
806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by
fire or explosive.
Page 48 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
479
810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling;
unarmed; no assault or battery.
480
810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied
dwelling; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
481
810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied
conveyance; unarmed; no assault
or battery.
482
810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized
emergency vehicle.
483
812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at
$100,000 or more or a
semitrailer deployed by a law
enforcement officer; property
stolen while causing other
property damage; 1st degree
grand theft.
484
812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued
at less than $50,000, grand
Page 49 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
theft in 2nd degree.
485
812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency
medical equipment; 2nd degree
grand theft.
486
812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law
enforcement equipment from
authorized emergency vehicle.
487
812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree;
firearm with previous
conviction of s.
812.014(2)(c)5.
488
812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $50,000 or more.
489
812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates,
organizes, plans, etc., the
theft of property and traffics
in stolen property.
490
812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching.
491
Page 50 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly
weapon, or other weapon.
492
817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value
greater than $50,000.
493
817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle
accident victims with intent to
defraud.
494
817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or
participating in an intentional
motor vehicle collision.
495
817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value
$100,000 or more.
496
817.2341 1st Making false entries of
(2)(b) & material fact or false
(3)(b) statements regarding property
values relating to the solvency
of an insuring entity which are
a significant cause of the
insolvency of that entity.
497
Page 51 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or
advertising personal protective
equipment with intent to
defraud.
498
817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a
vaccine with intent to defraud.
499
817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other
unauthorized document.
500
817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49
counterfeit credit cards or
related documents.
501
825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or
disabled adult causing great
bodily harm, disability, or
disfigurement.
502
825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or
disabled adult and property is
valued at $10,000 or more, but
less than $50,000.
503
Page 52 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing
great bodily harm, disability,
or disfigurement.
504
3rd Impregnation of a child under
827.04(3) 16 years of age by person 21
years of age or older.
505
827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a
sexual performance, or promote
or direct such performance.
506
827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote
any photographic material,
motion picture, etc., which
includes child pornography.
507
828.126(4) 3rd Causing or enticing a minor to
commit, or committing in the
presence of a minor, sexual
activities involving animals.
508
837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about
alleged capital felony to a law
enforcement officer.
Page 53 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
509
838.015 2nd Bribery.
510
838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward
for official behavior.
511
838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public
servant.
512
838.22 2nd Bid tampering.
513
843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public
officer or employee.
514
843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal
process.
515
843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public
officer or employee.
516
847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a
computer service, to commit an
unlawful sex act.
517
847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to
Page 54 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
commit an unlawful sex act.
518
872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body.
519
874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting
person under 13 to join a
criminal gang; second or
subsequent offense.
520
874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes,
plans, finances, directs,
manages, or supervises criminal
gang-related activity.
521
893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine (or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.)
within 1,000 feet of a child
care facility, school, or
state, county, or municipal
park or publicly owned
recreational facility or
community center.
Page 55 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
522
893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cocaine or other drug
prohibited under s.
893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d),
(2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.,
within 1,000 feet of property
used for religious services or
a specified business site.
523
893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substance.
524
893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more
than 25 lbs., less than 2,000
lbs.
525
893.135 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more
(1)(b)1.a. than 28 grams, less than 200
grams.
526
893.135 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs,
(1)(c)1.a. more than 4 grams, less than 14
grams.
Page 56 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
527
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28
(1)(c)2.a. grams or more, less than 50
grams.
528
893.135 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50
(1)(c)2.b. grams or more, less than 100
grams.
529
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7
(1)(c)3.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
530
893.135 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14
(1)(c)3.b. grams or more, less than 25
grams.
531
893.135 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4
(1)(c)4.b.(I) grams or more, less than 14
grams.
532
893.135 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine,
(1)(d)1.a. 28 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
533
Page 57 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone,
200 grams or more, less than 5
kilograms.
534
893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14
grams or more, less than 28
grams.
535
893.135 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4
(1)(g)1.a. grams or more, less than 14
grams.
536
893.135 1st Trafficking in gamma-
(1)(h)1.a. hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1
kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
537
893.135 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol,
(1)(j)1.a. 1 kilogram or more, less than 5
kilograms.
538
893.135 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines,
(1)(k)2.a. 10 grams or more, less than 200
grams.
539
Page 58 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.a. cannabinoids, 280 grams or
more, less than 500 grams.
540
893.135 1st Trafficking in synthetic
(1)(m)2.b. cannabinoids, 500 grams or
more, less than 1,000 grams.
541
893.135 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl
(1)(n)2.a. phenethylamines, 14 grams or
more, less than 100 grams.
542
893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for
trafficking in or manufacturing
of controlled substance.
543
896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
544
896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to
evade reporting or registration
requirements, financial
transactions exceeding $300 but
less than $20,000.
Page 59 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
545
943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating
permanent residence; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
546
943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in
state after indicating intent
to leave; failure to comply
with reporting requirements.
547
943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
548
943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
549
943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
Page 60 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
550
944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
comply with reporting
requirements.
551
944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
552
944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
553
944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
554
985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
submit to the taking of a
digitized photograph.
555
985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing
Page 61 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 559 2026 Legislature
false information about a
sexual offender; harbor or
conceal a sexual offender.
556
985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to
report and reregister; failure
to respond to address
verification; providing false
registration information.
557
558 Section 6. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 62 of 62
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb559 -01-er